Utah statutes.
51-7-2.   Exemptions from chapter.

The following funds are exempt from this chapter:

(1)  funds invested in accordance with the participating employees' designation or direction pursuant to a public employees' deferred compensation plan established and operated in compliance with Section 457 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;

(2)  funds of the Workers' Compensation Fund;

(3)  funds of the Utah State Retirement Board;

(4)  funds of the Utah Housing Corporation;

(5)  endowment funds of higher education institutions;

(6)  permanent and other land grant trust funds established pursuant to the Utah Enabling Act and the Utah Constitution; and

(7)  the State Post-Retirement Benefits Trust Fund.

